Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB340.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 67 of the act of June 22, 1931 (P.L.594, No.203), referred to as the Township State Highway Law, is amended by adding a route to read:Section 67. The township roads to be taken over, under the provisions of this act, in the COUNTY OF YORK, are those situate and described as follows:* * *Susquehanna Trail T-956 (formerly Legislative Route 333). Upon completion of certain proposed improvements and completion of the Canal Road State Route 921 betterment project, that 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 section of the Susquehanna Trail beginning at municipal line with Manchester Township, York County, station 1038+52 heading in a northerly direction to start of State Route 297, at station 1146+76, a distance of 10,824 feet or 2.05 miles.Section 2. If Conewago Township, York County, accepts the turn-back of Bowers Bridge Road (State Route 1013, formerly Legislative Route 66200) from a beginning point at Conewago Creek Road (State Route 1004), Segment 0010 Offset 0000 (station 0+00) heading in an easterly direction to intersection with Cly Road (State Route 1913), Segment 0030 Offset 3112 (station 91+13) for a distance of 9,113 feet or 1.726 miles, having an existing right-of-way width of 40 feet, and upon the completion of proposed improvements on State Route 921, the Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth shall transmit notice of the acceptance and completion of proposed improvements to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) This section shall take effect immediately.(2) Section 2 of this act shall take effect immediately.(3) The amendment of section 67 of the act shall take effect upon publication of the notice in the Pennsylvania Bulletin under section 2 of this act.20250HB0340PN0295 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223